Vermont, session 2025-2026, H865.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 1214 is added to read:
§ 1214. PUBLIC SERVANTS; TRAVEL DISCLOSURES
VT LEG #385199 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.865
2026 Page 2 of 3
(a) A public servant shall file with the Ethics Commission a disclosure
detailing costs and associated information for any travel made in course of the
public servant’s official capacity or because of the public servant’s status as a
public servant. As used in this section, traveling “because of a public servant’s
status” means that the travel would not have likely occurred but for the public
servant’s status as a public servant.
(b) A public servant shall disclose and designate:
(1) whether the travel was purely in the public servant’s official capacity
or a mixture of official and private purposes;
(2) any destination of travel, including any stopover or intentional visit
to another location prior to the destination of travel;
(3) the declared purpose of the travel;
(4) all costs associated with transportation to and from any destination,
and food, refreshments, tickets and admissions, entertainment, lodging, and
anything else of value, whether for cost or in-kind, associated with the travel;
(5) which elements of associated travel costs were paid for or provided
by:
(A) the State;
(B) the public servant’s own person; or
(C) any other sources, including associations, lobbyists, political
committees and parties, and individuals; and
VT LEG #385199 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.865
2026 Page 3 of 3
(6) an attestation to the veracity and completeness of the disclosed
information.
(c) A public servant shall file the disclosure with the Ethics Commission
within 30 calendar days after beginning the travel. If travel continues for more
than 30 calendar days, the public servant shall supplement the disclosure on a
weekly basis.
(d) Notwithstanding subsections (a)–(c) of this section, a public servant
shall not file a disclosure for any travel that constitutes regular commuting to
and from the public servant’s official place or places of work.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385199 v.1